Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-3002
Peace officer; release of photograph;
restrictions.

No
municipality or county shall publicly release a photograph of a peace officer
who is the subject of an investigation without the written permission of the
peace officer, except that the municipality or county may display a photograph
of a peace officer to a prospective witness as part of an investigation and
the municipality or county may provide a photograph of a peace officer to
the investigating individual to display to a prospective witness as part of
the investigation. This section does not apply to any municipality or county
accredited through the Commission on Accreditation for Law Enforcement Agencies.

Laws 2009, LB158, § 5.